apertium-ga-gv.gv.dix
    <pardef n="cur__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>mayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ee</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ym</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ysmayd</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ftr"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>in</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>agh</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>-shiu</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>rit</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="creg__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>gyn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="co/yr__n_f">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>yr</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ir</l>
          <r>yr<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ard__n_m">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>jyn</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="com"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="noid"><i>noid</i><par n="ard__n_m"/></e>
    <e lm="goayr"><par n="initial-g"/><i>oa</i><par n="co/yr__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="coyr"><par n="initial-c"/><i>o</i><par n="co/yr__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="creg"><par n="initial-c"/><i>reg</i><par n="creg__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="brasnag"><par n="initial-b"/><i>rasnag</i><par n="creg__n_f"/></e>
    <e lm="cur"><par n="initial-c"/><i>ur</i><par n="cur__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ard"><par n="initial-a"/><i>rd</i><par n="ard__n_m"/></e>
